Utah statutes.
53-10-403.5.   Definitions.
As used in Sections 53-10-404, 53-10-405, and 53-10-406:
(1)  "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.
(2)  "DNA specimen" or "specimen" means a sample of a person's saliva or
blood.
